North Carolina, session 2025, SB500.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of fourteen million dollars ($14,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Pamlico County for engineering and
constructing a new facility to house the County's Department of Health and Social Services on
property owned by the County. The former facility has been abandoned due to moisture and mold
problems.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S500-v-1*